Tennessee statutes. Title 38 Prevention And Detection Of Crime
Part 1

General Provisions

38-8-101. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Campus police officer” means a person commissioned by an employing institution and rendered an oath to provide police services, enforce law, exercise arrest authority and carry firearms in accordance with § 49-7-118;

“Full-time police officer” means any person employed by any municipality or political subdivision of the state of Tennessee whose primary responsibility is the prevention and detection of crime, and the apprehension of offenders, and whose primary source of income is derived from employment as a police officer;

“Part-time police officer,” “temporary police officer,” “reserve police officer,” or “auxiliary police officer” means any person employed by any municipality or any political subdivision of the state of Tennessee whose primary responsibility is to support the full-time police officer in the prevention and detection of crime, apprehension of offenders, and assisting in the prosecution of offenders for appropriate remuneration in measure with specifically assigned duties or job description. Part-time police officers shall work not more than twenty (20) hours per week, for a total of not more than one hundred (100) hours per month. Any police officer who works in excess of the maximum hours as specified in this subdivision (3) shall be reclassified to a full-time status and must meet all requirements for standards and training as mandated under the law and peace officer standards and training commission rules. In any situation where an officer is temporarily assigned, for a period of one (1) month or less, to work more than twenty (20) hours per week, for a total of not more than one hundred (100) hours per month, the officer shall not be reclassified to a full-time status;

“Private special deputy” means a person who is employed and compensated by a resort area owner or management company to act as security and law enforcement for the resort area and whose qualifications and training requirements are equivalent to or superior to those required for a law enforcement officer under the standards established by the peace officer standards and training commission for law enforcement officers;

“Public safety officer” means a person who, in addition to being a commissioned campus police officer under § 49-7-118(i)(1), performs other significant duties such as certified firefighter, medical first responder or other tasks associated with homeland security based on the needs of a particular institution; and

“Special deputy” means any person who is assigned specific police functions as to the prevention and detection of crime and general laws of this state on a volunteer basis, whether working alone or with other police officers.

Any police officer working on a volunteer basis shall receive no pay or benefits, except for honorariums, and may be utilized for an unlimited number of hours.

Acts 1981, ch. 455, § 3; T.C.A., § 38-11-101; Acts 1983, ch. 270, § 1; 1988, ch. 968, § 1; 1989, ch. 138, § 1; 1990, ch. 1094, § 1; 1993, ch. 374, § 1; 2006, ch. 862, § 1; 2009, ch. 190, § 1.

Cross-References. Acting as peace officers for office of homeland security, § 38-3-114.

Investigations of police officers, title 38, ch. 8, part 3.

Registration of persons acting as law enforcement officers, § 8-8-221.

Law Reviews.

Selected Tennessee Legislation of 1983 (N. L. Resener, J. A. Whitson, K. J. Miller), 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 785 (1983).

Attorney General Opinions. Part-time or reserve status does not disqualify officers from being considered qualified law enforcement officers for the purpose of the Law Enforcement Officers Safety Act of 2004, OAG 05-029 (3/21/05).

38-8-102. Tennessee peace officer standards and training commission — Creation and composition.

There is established the Tennessee peace officer standards and training commission, referred to in this part as the “commission.”

The commission shall consist of:

The attorney general and reporter, or the attorney general and reporter's designee;

One (1) police officer below the rank of assistant chief, or equivalent rank, who shall be appointed by the governor for a term of four (4) years;

Two (2) sheriffs and two (2) municipal chiefs of police, who shall be appointed by the governor and serve at the governor's pleasure;

One (1) nonsupervisory police officer, who shall be appointed by the governor for a term of four (4) years;

One (1) member of the senate and one (1) member of the house of representatives, who shall be appointed by the respective speakers and who shall be voting members of the commission, to serve for a term of two (2) years;

Two (2) citizens who are not connected with law enforcement, who shall be appointed by the respective speakers and be subject to the confirmation requirements of subdivision (b)(1)(F)(ii), to each serve for a term of two (2) years;

(a) Except as otherwise provided in this subdivision (b)(1)(F)(ii):

(ii) (a) Except as otherwise provided in this subdivision (b)(1)(F)(ii):

One (1) citizen member appointed under subdivision (b)(1)(F)(i) shall be confirmed by a resolution of the house of representatives prior to beginning a term of office; and

One (1) citizen member appointed under subdivision (b)(1)(F)(i) shall be confirmed by a resolution of the senate prior to beginning a term of office;

If the general assembly is not in session at the time a citizen member is appointed to fill a vacancy, the new appointee shall serve for the term appointed unless such appointment is not confirmed within ninety (90) calendar days after the general assembly next convenes in regular session following such appointment; and

Three (3) additional members, whom the governor shall appoint for terms of three (3) years.

The commission shall include at least one (1) person who is of a racial minority.

The members of the commission shall elect the chair of the commission.

A member of the commission who misses more than fifty percent (50%) of the scheduled meetings in a calendar year shall be removed as a member of the commission.

The chair of the commission shall promptly notify the respective appointing authority of any member who fails to satisfy the attendance requirement as prescribed in subdivision (d)(1).

Acts 1981, ch. 455, § 1; T.C.A., § 38-11-102; Acts 1983, ch. 270, § 2; 1987, ch. 412, §§ 3, 4; 2012, ch. 986, § 5; 2015, ch. 37, §§ 3, 4; 2017, ch. 301, § 1; 2018, ch. 989, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. The Tennessee peace officers standards and training commission, created by this section, terminates June 30, 2025. See §§ 4-29-112, 4-29-246.

Acts 2012, ch. 986, § 48 provided that all rules, regulations, orders, and decisions heretofore issued or promulgated by any of the boards or commissions, which the act terminates or merges into another board or commission, shall remain in full force and effect. In the case of the boards or commissions that are merged with another board or commission by the act, all final rules, regulations, orders, and decisions together with any matters that are pending on October 1, 2012, shall hereafter be administered, enforced, modified, or rescinded in accordance with the law applicable to the continuing board or commission.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment added “, or the attorney general and reporter's designee” to the end of (b)(1)(A) and substituted “voting” for “nonvoting” preceding “members” in (b)(1)(E).

The 2017 amendment added (d).

The 2018 amendment rewrote (b)(1)(F) which read: “Two (2) citizens who are not connected with law enforcement to serve for a term of two (2) years, one (1) of whom shall be appointed by a resolution of the house of representatives and one (1) of whom shall be appointed by a resolution of the senate; and”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 37, § 5. March 27, 2015.

Acts 2017, ch. 301, § 4. July 1, 2017.

Acts 2018, ch. 989, § 2. May 21, 2018.

Attorney General Opinions. When a person serving as a commissioner experiences a change of status whereby he/she no longer fits the criteria set forth by law, he/she is no longer eligible to serve as a member of the POST commission, and that position becomes vacant by that commissioner's ineligibility. OAG 05-088 (5/24/05).

POST certification of bailiffs and court officers. OAG 10-107, 2010 Tenn. AG LEXIS 113 (10/28/10).

38-8-103. Director — Staff — Expenses of members.

The director of the Jerry F. Agee Tennessee law enforcement training academy shall serve as the executive secretary of the commission.

Staff for the commission shall be provided through the law enforcement training academy.

The members of the commission shall serve without remuneration, but shall be paid expenses as the members may incur in attending the commission's meetings or in traveling on commission business. All reimbursement for travel expenses shall be in accordance with the comprehensive travel regulations promulgated by the department of finance and administration and approved by the attorney general and reporter.

Acts 1981, ch. 455, § 2; T.C.A., § 38-11-103.

Attorney General Opinions. The duality of function created by the director of the Tennessee law enforcement training academy acting as the executive secretary of the Tennessee peace officer standards and training commission does not violate the intent or the mandate of any law or constitutional provision regarding a conflict of interest, OAG 06-120 (8/1/06).

There is no conflict or other legal impediment in the staff for the Tennessee peace officer standards and training commission being provided through the Tennessee law enforcement training academy, OAG 06-120 (8/1/06).

38-8-104. Powers and duties of commission.

The commission shall:

Develop, plan, and implement law enforcement training programs for all local law enforcement officers in Tennessee;

Function as a clearing house for training programs related to local law enforcement;

Receive, administer, and expend local, state, federal, and other monetary assistance in the form of grants or otherwise, in order to further any of the commission's purposes pursuant to this chapter;

Establish uniform standards for the employment and training of police recruits and police officers, including preemployment qualifications and requirements for officer certification;

Establish minimum standards and curriculum requirements for the courses of study offered by or for any municipality, the state of Tennessee or any political subdivision of the state, and universities, colleges, community colleges, colleges of applied technology, and other educational institutions for the specific purpose of training police recruits or police officers;

Consult and cooperate with municipalities, the state of Tennessee or any political subdivision of the state, and universities, colleges, community colleges, colleges of applied technology, and other educational institutions for the specific purpose of training police recruits or police officers;

Consult and cooperate with municipalities, the state of Tennessee or any political subdivision of the state, and universities, colleges, community colleges, colleges of applied technology, and other educational institutions concerning the development of police training schools and programs limited to education and training in the area of police science, police administration, and all allied and supporting fields;

Approve facilities for school operation by or for any municipality, the state of Tennessee or any political subdivision of the state, and universities, colleges, community colleges, colleges of applied technology, and other educational institutions for the specific purpose of training police recruits and police officers;

Issue certification to persons who, by reason of experience and completion of in-service, advanced education or specialized training, are especially qualified for particular aspects or classes of police work;

Make or encourage studies on any aspect of police education, training, and recruitment; and

Administer income supplements for police officers.

The commission, in addition to all the powers and duties vested in it by law, is vested with the power and is charged with the duty of observing, administering, and enforcing all the provisions of this chapter.

The commission is authorized to adopt and enforce such rules and regulations as may be necessary to carry out this chapter.

The commission shall have the authority to establish criteria for determining whether to grant an exception to or waive the qualifications of minimum standards as provided in § 38-8-106, based on a person's previous law enforcement experience and training.

The commission shall establish criteria for determining whether to grant an exception to or to waive the qualifications of § 38-8-106, for a person hired as a police officer after July 1, 1987, except that no waiver or exception shall be granted for dishonorable discharge from the military, mental impairment which affects the person's ability to perform an essential function of the job with or without a reasonable accommodation, or a narcotics violation that could result in a felony charge. The commission's decisions with regard to exceptions or waivers granted under this subsection (e) shall be appealable to the chancery court. The commission shall adopt rules and regulations in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, to implement this subsection (e).

The commission shall establish standards for the certification of railroad police officers commissioned pursuant to § 65-6-133.

The commission has the authority to obtain a set of classifiable fingerprints for any person hired as a police officer or enrolled as a police recruit in an approved recruit training program and to submit the set of fingerprints to the Tennessee bureau of investigation for a search of its criminal history records systems to determine whether the person has any recorded convictions in Tennessee and meets the minimum qualifications as provided in § 38-8-106. The Tennessee bureau of investigation shall forward the set of fingerprints to the federal bureau of investigation for a search of the national criminal history database per federal bureau of investigation policy to determine whether the person has any recorded convictions and meets the minimum qualifications as provided in § 38-8-106.

Acts 1981, ch. 455, § 4; T.C.A., § 38-11-104; Acts 1983, ch. 209, § 1; 1983, ch. 270, §§ 3, 4; 1987, ch. 412, §§ 2, 5; 2006, ch. 1009, § 4; 2009, ch. 372, § 1; 2013, ch. 137, § 3; 2017, ch. 151, §§ 1, 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2009, ch. 372, § 4, provided that the act, which added §§ 38-8-104(f), 38-8-107(e), and 65-6-133(h), shall apply to any railroad police officer commissioned pursuant to § 65-6-133 on or after July 1, 2009.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment, in (a), inserted “police recruits and” in (4), inserted “and universities, colleges, community colleges, colleges of applied technology, and other educational institutions” in (5), (6), and (8), substituted “and universities, colleges, community colleges, colleges of applied technology,” for “and with universities, colleges, junior colleges” in (7), and substituted “the state of Tennessee” for the first occurrence of “the state” in (8); and added (g).

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 151, § 4. July 1, 2017.

Attorney General Opinions. There is no requirement that the person filing a complaint with the peace officers standards and training commission be a law enforcement agency or have any particular standing, but only the commission can actually vote to suspend or revoke the certification of an officer, OAG 00-191 (12/20/00).

Certification requirements for police officers, OAG 05-131 (8/24/05).

The Peace Officer Standards & Training (POST) Commission has authority to impose a fee for both statewide and nationwide certification and, in its discretion, to determine a reasonable fee for the issuance of firearm certifications. The Commission may also establish such rules and regulations as are necessary to administer its duties. OAG 18-44, 2018 Tenn. AG LEXIS 41 (9/18/2018).

38-8-105. Minimum standards binding on governmental entities — Penalty for violation.

Requirements for minimum standards as set forth in this part or as required by the commission shall be mandatory and binding upon any municipality, county or political subdivision of this state.

Any person who appoints any applicant, who, to the knowledge of the appointer, fails to meet the minimum standards as set forth in this part or required by the commission, and any person who signs the warrant or check for the payment of the salary of any person who, to the knowledge of the signer, fails to meet the qualifications as a police officer as provided in this part or required by the commission, commits a Class A misdemeanor, and upon conviction shall be subject to a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000).

This section shall not apply to any police officer hired by any municipality, county, or political subdivision of this state prior to July 1, 1982.

Notwithstanding any citizenship requirement in a private act or charter provision to the contrary, a municipality, county, political subdivision of this state, or state law enforcement agency is authorized to employ a police officer who is a permanent legal resident of the United States and an honorably discharged veteran of the United States armed forces; provided, that the police officer applies for or obtains United States citizenship within six (6) years of the employment start date with the law enforcement agency.

Acts 1981, ch. 455, § 5; 1982, ch. 747, §§ 1, 2; 1989, ch. 591, §§ 1, 6; T.C.A., § 38-11-105; 2015, ch. 498, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

The misdemeanor in this section has been designated as a Class A misdemeanor by authority of § 40-35-110, which provides that an offense designated a misdemeanor without specification as to category is a Class A misdemeanor. See also § 39-11-114.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment added (d).

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 498, § 3. May 20, 2015.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class A misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

Attorney General Opinions. Applicability to capitol police officers, OAG 84-247 (8/21/84).

Neither federal nor state law prohibits the department of safety from hiring a non-citizen as a trooper, and the status of the law was the same in 1998, OAG 05-053 (4/20/05).

38-8-106. Qualifications of police officers.

Any person employed as a full-time police officer, and any person employed or utilized as a part-time, temporary, reserve or auxiliary police officer or as a special deputy, shall:

Be at least eighteen (18) years of age;

Be a citizen of the United States, or a permanent legal resident of the United States who is an honorably discharged veteran of the United States armed forces pursuant to § 38-8-105(d);

Be a high school graduate or possess its equivalent, which shall include a general educational development (GED(R)) certificate;

Not have been convicted of or pleaded guilty to or entered a plea of nolo contendere to any felony charge or to any violation of any federal or state laws or city ordinances relating to force, violence, theft, dishonesty, gambling, liquor, controlled substances or controlled substance analogues;

Not have been released or discharged under any other than honorable discharge from any of the armed forces of the United States;

Have the person's fingerprints on file with the Tennessee bureau of investigation;

Have passed a physical examination by a licensed physician or a nurse practitioner or physician assistant, so long as the task is expressly included in the written protocol developed jointly by the supervising physician and the nurse practitioner or physician assistant, whichever is applicable, setting forth the range of services that may be performed by the nurse practitioner or physician assistant;

Have a good moral character as determined by a thorough investigation conducted by the employing agency; and

Have been certified by a Tennessee licensed health care provider qualified in the psychiatric or psychological field as being free from any impairment, as set forth in the current edition of the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders (DSM) of the American Psychiatric Association at the time of the examination, that would, in the professional judgment of the examiner, affect the applicant's ability to perform an essential function of the job, with or without a reasonable accommodation.

Acts 1981, ch. 455, § 6; T.C.A., § 38-11-106; Acts 1983, ch. 270, § 6; 1988, ch. 968, § 2; 1990, ch. 1094, § 2; 1993, ch. 374, § 2; 2001, ch. 42, § 1; 2009, ch. 264, § 1; 2012, ch. 848, § 12; 2013, ch. 137, § 4; 2015, ch. 498, § 2.

Code Commission Notes.

The provisions in subdivision (3), which formerly permitted a high school equivalency degree from a correspondence school to be sufficient proof of a high school education to qualify such person to be a police officer, ceased to be effective April 4, 2002. At such time, a high school degree or general educational development (GED(R)) certificate is required to satisfy § 38-8-106(3). However, the repeal of the amendment to subdivision (3) by Acts 2001, ch. 42, § 2 shall not disqualify any person who, by virtue of such repealed provision, has become employed as a police officer or has received a certificate of compliance from the peace officers standards and training commission certifying that the person meets the qualifications required by § 38-8-106, from remaining a police officer or certified as qualified to be a police officer.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment rewrote (2), which read, “Be a citizen of the United States;”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 498, § 3. May 20, 2015.

Attorney General Opinions. Peace officers standards and training (POST) pre-employment requirements, OAG 00-026 (2/15/00).

Finding of criminal contempt not conviction under T.C.A. § 38-8-106(4), OAG 03-071 (5/27/03).

Person who has been convicted of or pleaded guilty or entered a plea of nolo contendere to a charge or violation as set forth at T.C.A. § 38-8-106(4) is not eligible for employment as a police officer, even though the conviction or plea was entered in another state and was subsequently set aside under a law of that state, OAG 03-095 (7/28/03).

Agency can prohibit off-duty carrying of firearms by part-time or reserve police officers, OAG 05-029 (3/21/05).

Certification requirements for police officers, OAG 05-131 (8/24/05).

Restoration of citizenship rights will not make a person eligible for employment as a police officer or for election or appointment as a sheriff, OAG 06-045 (3/10/06).

Where a candidate for chief of police pled guilty to the misdemeanor offense of “attempt to commit a felony,” the Peace Officer Standards and Training Commission could properly grant a waiver of preemployment requirements to allow the candidate to serve, OAG 06-173 (12/4/06).

38-8-107. Certification of officers — In-service training by employing agency.

The commission shall issue a certificate of compliance to any person who meets the qualifications for employment and satisfactorily completes an approved recruit training program. All officers employed on and after July 1, 2017, must:

Enroll in an approved recruit training program within six (6) months of their date of employment;

Successfully complete an approved recruit training program as required by this part; and

Successfully complete an annual in-service training session appropriate for their rank and responsibilities.

Failure of an individual officer to successfully complete the in-service training requirement will result in the officer's loss of eligibility for the pay supplement in § 38-8-111. Failure of this individual officer to successfully complete another in-service training session within one (1) year will result in loss of certification. Each employing agency participating in the commission's training program must file a letter of intent with the commission stating its commitment to mandatory training for all law enforcement officers. Failure of several officers from one (1) employing agency shall be cause for the commission to examine that agency's training policy and may result in the agency's being declared out of compliance with state standards and thereby not eligible to participate in the commission's training programs at no cost. Any travel expense shall be borne by the employing agency.

The commission may issue a certificate to any person who has received training in another state if the commission determines that such training is at least equivalent to that required by the commission for approved police education and training programs in this state and when such person has satisfactorily complied with all other requirements of this chapter.

The commission shall also issue a certificate of compliance to any person employed as a campus police officer or public safety officer; provided, that the person meets the qualifications for employment as a police officer and satisfactorily completes an approved recruit training program as required by this part. To retain such certification, the campus police officer or public safety officer shall also successfully complete an annual in-service training session appropriate for the officer's rank and responsibilities.

The commission shall also issue a certificate of compliance to any person seeking to be commissioned as a railroad police officer pursuant to § 65-6-133; provided, that the person meets the qualifications for employment as a police officer and satisfactorily completes an approved recruit training program as required by this part. To retain this certification, the railroad police officer shall also successfully complete an annual in-service training session appropriate for the officer's rank and responsibilities.

Acts 1981, ch. 455, § 7; T.C.A., § 38-11-107; Acts 1983, ch. 270, §§ 7, 8; 1990, ch. 1094, § 3; 1993, ch. 374, § 3; 2002, ch. 795, § 1; 2009, ch. 190, § 2; 2009, ch. 372, § 2; 2017, ch. 151, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2009, ch. 372, § 4, provided that the act, which added §§ 38-8-104(f), 38-8-107(e), and 65-6-133(h), shall apply to any railroad police officer commissioned pursuant to § 65-6-133 on or after July 1, 2009.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment rewrote (a) which read: “(a) The commission shall issue a certificate of compliance to any person who meets the qualifications for employment and satisfactorily completes an approved recruit training program. All officers employed after July 1, 1983, must successfully complete recruit training within one (1) year of their date of employment and thereafter must successfully complete an annual in-service training session appropriate for their rank and responsibilities.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 151, § 4. July 1, 2017.

38-8-108. Donations of property or money to commission.

The commission may accept, for any of its purposes and functions under this chapter, any and all donations of property, real, personal or mixed, and grants of money from any governmental unit or public agency, or from any institution, person, firm or corporation. Such moneys shall be deposited, disbursed and administered in a trust fund as provided by the laws of Tennessee.

Acts 1981, ch. 455, § 8; T.C.A., § 38-11-108.

38-8-109. Stricter qualifications and standards by employing agency.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to preclude an employing agency from establishing qualifications and standards for hiring and training police officers that exceed those set by the commission.

Acts 1981, ch. 455, § 9; T.C.A., § 38-11-109.

38-8-110. Application of chapter.

This chapter does not apply to any elected officers or to any employees of the state of Tennessee, except that this chapter applies to sheriffs under § 38-8-111.

Acts 1981, ch. 455, § 10; T.C.A., § 38-11-110; Acts 1983, ch. 270, § 5; 1993, ch. 374, § 3.

38-8-111. In-service training — Cash supplements.

An eligible local unit of government that requires all police officers to complete an in-service training course each calendar year appropriate to the officer's rank and responsibility and the size and location of the officer's department, of at least forty (40) hours duration at a school certified or recognized by the commission, is entitled to receive a pay supplement of eight hundred dollars ($800) for any one (1) officer in any one (1) year, from the commission, to be paid to each officer, in addition to the officer's regular salary. Police officers are eligible for the pay supplement upon successful completion of forty (40) hours of the in-service training.

An officer who has not completed eight (8) months of full-time service during the calendar year is not eligible to receive the salary supplement, except in the case of death of the officer, retirement, or medical disability. Upon submission of proper documentation by an officer, the commission shall include time spent in active military service when calculating the required eight (8) months of full-time service.

Notwithstanding any other law, rule or regulation to the contrary, any police officer who served or serves on active duty in the armed forces of the United States during Operation Enduring Freedom, or any other period of armed conflict prescribed by presidential proclamation or federal law that occurs following the period involving Operation Enduring Freedom, shall receive the cash salary supplement provided pursuant to this section, if such service prevented or prevents such police officer from attending the in-service training program pursuant to this section.

If an officer does not complete the in-service training program required by this section due to the death of the officer while in the line of duty, as determined pursuant to § 7-51-210, then the officer's designated beneficiary shall receive the cash salary supplement provided pursuant to this section despite the failure to complete the required in-service training.

Commission funds made available under subsection (a) to local units shall be received, held and expended in accordance with subsections (a)-(c), including the rules and regulations issued by the commission, and the following specific restrictions:

Funds provided shall be used only as a cash salary supplement to police officers;

Each police officer shall be entitled to receive the state supplement that the officer's qualifications brought to the local unit;

Funds provided shall not be used to supplant existing salaries or as substitutes for normal salary increases periodically due to police officers; and

The cash salary supplement shall be considered as a bonus for the successful completion of training and shall not be considered as salary for subsequent years' determination of supplement or retirement purposes.

No funds shall be expended under subsections (a)-(c) unless such funds are specifically appropriated for the purposes set forth in subsections (a) and (b).

Any municipality or county legislative body may by resolution choose, by a two-thirds (2/3) vote of its entire membership, to establish an in-service training program together with a cash supplement for certified correction officers employed by the municipality or by the county. This program shall be separate from those programs operating pursuant to subsections (a)-(c). Each participating municipality or county shall establish criteria and rules and regulations governing its own program.

If the certification of any police officer is revoked on the grounds that such officer supplied or acquiesced in false information being supplied to the commission regarding the officer's eligibility for certification, then the officer shall be ineligible to receive the supplement authorized by this section. If revocation occurs after the supplement has been paid, the officer shall return to the commission the full amount of the supplement paid. If the officer fails to return the supplement within sixty (60) days of the revocation of the certification, the commission may sue to recover the amount of the supplement in the appropriate circuit court.

The commission may, in addition to or in lieu of any other lawful action, withhold the next pay supplement due an officer certified under this part if the officer certified under this part fails to notify the executive secretary of the commission of an arrest as prescribed in § 38-8-126(a)(1).

All sheriffs shall complete annual in-service training as set forth in this subsection (f) and shall receive cash salary supplements as provided by the commission for police officers. The commission shall apply the terms and conditions of this chapter to any sheriff with the exceptions contained in this subsection (f), and in performing its duties, the commission shall recognize the sheriff is an elected official without any employing agency.

Sheriffs successfully completing the annual training shall receive cash salary supplements in the same manner and under the same conditions as set forth in this part for police officers, except that the commission shall make the funds for salary supplements available to the appropriate counties for payment to sheriffs.

The commission shall issue to any sheriff successfully completing recruit training, or possessing its equivalency, and completing continuing annual training, a sheriff's certificate of compliance in the manner in which it issues police officers' certificates of compliance. A sheriff already holding any certificate of compliance from the commission may request the commission to recognize such sheriff's certification. A sheriff receiving a certificate of compliance has a continuing duty to meet all requirements as set forth in this section and § 8-8-102. In the event a person holding a police officer's certificate of compliance assumes the office of sheriff, the commission shall substitute for the police officer certificate, a sheriff's certificate of compliance.

The Tennessee peace officer standards and training commission is authorized to carry out the provisions of § 8-4-115.

Acts 1981, ch. 455, § 11; T.C.A., § 38-11-111; Acts 1987, ch. 374, § 1; 1990, ch. 817, § 1; 1992, ch. 600, § 1; 1993, ch. 374, § 4; 1997, ch. 440, §§ 1-3; 1997, ch. 502, § 6; 2003, ch. 289, § 2; 2007, ch. 567, § 3; 2016, ch. 530, § 2; 2017, ch. 301, § 3; 2019, ch. 152, § 2.

Code Commission Notes.

This section may be affected by § 9-1-116, concerning entitlement to funds, absent appropriation.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1992, ch. 600, § 2 provided that the 1992 amendment by that act was retroactive to include potential supplements for the years 1990 and 1991 for any law enforcement officer who served in Operation Desert Storm.

Acts 1993, ch. 374, § 6 provided that nothing in the amendment by that act shall be construed as prohibiting any sheriff in office on July 1, 1993, from seeking re-election and being re-elected to such office.

Amendments. The 2016 amendment added (a)(4).

The 2017 amendment added (e)(2).

The 2019 amendment substituted “eight hundred dollars ($800)” for “six hundred dollars ($600)” near the end of the first sentence in (a)(1).

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 530, § 3. February, 1, 2016.

Acts 2017, ch. 301, § 4. July 1, 2017.

Acts 2019, ch. 152, § 3. July 1, 2019.

Cross-References. Child sexual abuse instruction included as part of in-service training requirement for salary supplement eligibility, § 37-1-603.

Driver license photo fee allocated to police pay supplement, § 55-50-324.

Police pay supplement fund, § 9-4-204.

38-8-112. Courses on use of citations in lieu of arrest — Domestic violence training — Procedures to respond to persons with mental illness.

The curriculum requirements of the Tennessee peace officer standards and training commission established by this part shall include materials concerning the use of citations in lieu of arrest and domestic violence training and proper procedures to respond to persons with mental illnesses.

Acts 1985, ch. 320, § 9; 2001, ch. 3, § 1; 2007, ch. 259, § 2.

Cross-References. Domestic abuse, title 36, ch. 3, part 6.

Domestic violence state coordinating council, title 38, ch. 12.

Domestic violence training for firefighters, § 4-24-111.

Emergency detention of mentally ill persons, §§ 33-6-401, 33-6-402.

Use of citations in lieu of arrest, § 40-7-118.

38-8-113. Choke hold and restraining maneuver training.

Use of choke holds and other similar restraining maneuvers, with or without the use of a police baton, if included in the training curriculum, shall be taught to candidates at state law enforcement training facilities as an alternative method of restraint to be used after mace or other less dangerous methods of restraint have failed to be effective or are unavailable.

Acts 1994, ch. 893, § 1.

Cross-References. Use of chokeholds, § 38-3-121.

38-8-114. Community policing pilot programs.

The commission shall encourage the use of community policing by establishing six (6) pilot programs for communities across the state. The commission shall establish two (2) pilot programs in each of the three (3) grand divisions with a reasonable distribution between urban and rural areas. The commission may provide a grant of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for a community policing pilot program to a community that submits a proposal to the commission. To qualify for the grant funds, a community shall satisfy the criteria for participation established by the commission.

Acts 1996, ch. 985, § 1.

Cross-References. Grand divisions, title 4, ch. 1, part 2.